Tennessee, session 114, SB1805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-165(a), is amended by deleting
"sixty-seven and one-half percent (67.5%)" and substituting "one hundred and ten percent
(110%)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-165(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 15, is amended by
deleting the part.
SECTION 4. Any funds remaining in the ambulance service assessment revenue fund
created pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, § 71-5-1508(a), after June 30, 2026, must
remain in the fund until expended or disbursed in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated,
§ 71-5-1508(f) and (g), as applicable and as existed on June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1805
011235
- 1 -